Hawaii statutes.
[§46-165] Other rights not affected.
Nothing in this part shall be construed to invalidate any provision relating to
the transference or purchase of development rights heretofore or hereafter
adopted by any county. [L 1998, c 296, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next